New Mexico, session 2026, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million one hundred thousand dollars ($1,100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environment for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to plan, design and construct improvements to the Mora mutual domestic water consumers and mutual sewage association water system in Mora county. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232759.1